Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202686-1505
Broadband deployment program; compliance; deployment project area; support; transfer.

After a granting agency makes final payment of public funds under a broadband deployment program to a competitive provider in a deployment project area that is part of a local exchange area served by an incumbent carrier, upon request by the incumbent carrier or competitive provider the commission expeditiously shall:

(1) Upon finding that the granting agency has determined the competitive provider is in compliance with all requirements of the broadband deployment program, relieve the incumbent carrier of eligible telecommunications carrier obligations and carrier of last resort obligations in the deployment project area;

(2) Consistent with rules of procedure adopted and promulgated by the commission, make determinations related to allocations and distributions of support from the Nebraska Telecommunications Universal Service Fund for the deployment project area; and

(3) In coordination with the Federal Communications Commission, and in consultation with the incumbent carrier and the competitive provider, determine whether eligible telecommunications carrier and carrier of last resort obligations corresponding with support from the Nebraska Telecommunications Universal Service Fund in the deployment project area should be transferred to the competitive provider.

Laws 2023, LB683, § 16;

Laws 2025, LB311, § 20.